Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF2676.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: DIVISION I SHORT TITLE Section 1. SHORT TITLE. This Act shall be known and may be cited as the âIowa Make America Healthy Again Actâ. DIVISION II CONTINUING EDUCATION REQUIREMENTS ââ NUTRITION AND METABOLIC HEALTH Sec. 2. Section 148.3, Code 2026, is amended by adding the following new subsection: NEW SUBSECTION . 5. The board shall adopt rules pursuant to chapter 17A requiring a licensee practicing family medicine, internal medicine, pediatrics, psychiatry, endocrinology, gastroenterology, cardiology, oncology, rheumatology, neurology, nephrology, dermatology, pulmonology, surgery, immunology, hematology, obstetrics, or gynecology to complete a minimum of one hour of continuing education on nutrition and metabolic health every four years as a condition of license renewal. Sec. 3. Section 148C.3, subsection 1, paragraph c, Code 2026, is amended to read as follows: House File 2676, p. 2 c. Hours of continuing medical education necessary to become or remain licensed. The board shall adopt rules pursuant to chapter 17A requiring a licensee practicing family medicine, internal medicine, pediatrics, psychiatry, endocrinology, gastroenterology, cardiology, oncology, rheumatology, neurology, nephrology, dermatology, pulmonology, surgery, immunology, hematology, obstetrics, or gynecology to complete a minimum of one hour of continuing education on nutrition and metabolic health every four years as a condition of license renewal. DIVISION III MEDICAL SCHOOL GRADUATION REQUIREMENT ââ NUTRITION Sec. 4. NEW SECTION . 148.15 Medical school graduation requirement ââ nutrition. Beginning July 1, 2028, a medical school or college of osteopathic medicine and surgery in this state shall require as a condition of graduation that each student complete at least forty hours of coursework on nutrition and metabolic health. DIVISION IV SUPPLEMENTAL NUTRITION ASSISTANCE PROGRAM ââ SUMMER ELECTRONIC BENEFITS TRANSFER FOR CHILDREN PROGRAM Sec. 5. Section 234.1, Code 2026, is amended by adding the following new subsection: NEW SUBSECTION . 4A. âSummer electronic benefits transfer for children programâ or âsummer EBT programâ means the summer electronic benefits transfer for children program established in 42 U.S.C. Â§1762. Sec. 6. NEW SECTION . 234.12B Supplemental nutrition assistance program ââ summer electronic benefits transfer for children program. 1. The department shall do all of the following: a. Implement a SNAP waiver upon receipt of approval by the United States department of agriculture, food and nutrition service, and continuously maintain state participation in SNAP in accordance with waiver guidelines specifying that eligible foods pursuant to 7 C.F.R. Â§271.2 are healthy foods as defined by the director or the directorâs designee. b. Contingent upon the availability of federal funding, ensure that the provision of SNAP benefits to recipients is House File 2676, p. 3 uninterrupted in accordance with federal law, regardless of whether the United States department of agriculture, food and nutrition service, approves state participation utilizing only eligible foods as described in paragraph âaâ . 2. The department may participate in the summer EBT program subject to federally approved eligible foods for the summer EBT program being consistent with eligible foods as described in subsection 1, paragraph âaâ . DIVISION V SCHOOL FOODS AND BEVERAGES Sec. 7. Section 256E.7, subsection 2, Code 2026, is amended by adding the following new paragraph: NEW PARAGRAPH . 0t. Be subject to and comply with the requirements of section 283A.6 relating to the preparation of meals provided to students, and prohibited ingredients in meals provided to students, in the same manner as a school district, if the charter school provides a breakfast or lunch program through the national school lunch program or the school breakfast program administered by the food and nutrition service of the United States department of agriculture. Sec. 8. Section 256F.4, subsection 2, Code 2026, is amended by adding the following new paragraph: NEW PARAGRAPH . v. Be subject to and comply with the requirements of section 283A.6 relating to the preparation of meals provided to students, and prohibited ingredients in meals provided to students, in the same manner as a school district, if the charter school or innovation zone school provides a breakfast or lunch program. Sec. 9. NEW SECTION . 283A.6 School district breakfast and lunch programs ââ food and beverages provided to students ââ prohibited ingredients. 1. a. A school district shall not serve a meal to students as part of the school districtâs breakfast or lunch program that contains any of the following ingredients: (1) Blue dye 1. (2) Blue dye 2. (3) Green dye 3. (4) Potassium bromate. (5) Propylparaben. House File 2676, p. 4 (6) Red dye 40. (7) Yellow dye 5. (8) Yellow dye 6. b. Paragraph âaâ does not apply to food and beverages received as part of a direct delivery from the foods in schools program of the United States department of agriculture. 2. An employee or contracted vendor of a school district shall not provide any food or beverages that contain an ingredient described in subsection 1 to a student enrolled in the school district during the school day. 3. A school district shall not permit the sale to students of any foods or beverages that contain an ingredient described in subsection 1 on the school campus, as school campus is defined in 7 C.F.R. Â§210.11 as of January 1, 2026, unless the sale takes place outside of the school day, as school day is defined in 7 C.F.R. Â§210.11 as of January 1, 2026. Sec. 10. Section 283A.10, Code 2026, is amended to read as follows: 283A.10 School breakfast or lunch in nonpublic schools. The authorities in charge of nonpublic schools may operate or provide for the operation of school breakfast or lunch programs in schools under their jurisdiction and may use funds appropriated to them by the general assembly, gifts, funds received from sale of school breakfasts or lunches under such programs, and any other funds available to the nonpublic school. However, school breakfast or lunch programs shall not be required in nonpublic schools. The department of education shall direct the disbursement of state funds to nonpublic schools for school breakfast or lunch programs in the same manner as state funds are disbursed to public schools. If a nonpublic school receives state funds for the operation of a school breakfast or lunch program, meals served under the program shall be nutritionally adequate meals, as defined in section 283A.1 , and shall comply with the requirements of section 283A.6 . Sec. 11. APPLICABILITY. This division of this Act applies to school years beginning on or after July 1, 2027. DIVISION VI EPINEPHRINE DELIVERY SYSTEMS House File 2676, p. 5 Sec. 12. Section 135.185, Code 2026, is amended to read as follows: 135.185 Epinephrine auto-injector delivery system supply. 1. For purposes of this section , unless the context otherwise requires: a. âEpinephrine auto-injector delivery system â means the same as provided in section 280.16 . b. âFacilityâ means a food establishment as defined in section 137F.1 , a carnival as defined in section 88A.1 , a recreational camp, a youth sports facility, or a sports arena. c. âLicensed health care professionalâ means the same as provided in section 280.16 . d. âPersonnel authorized to administer epinephrineâ means an employee or agent of a facility who is trained and authorized to administer an epinephrine auto-injector delivery system . 2. Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, a licensed health care professional may prescribe epinephrine auto-injectors delivery systems in the name of a facility to be maintained for use as provided in this section . 3. A facility may obtain a prescription for epinephrine auto-injectors delivery systems and maintain a supply of such auto-injectors delivery systems in a secure location at each location where a member of the public may be present for use as provided in this section . A facility that obtains such a prescription shall replace epinephrine auto-injectors delivery systems in the supply upon use or expiration. Personnel authorized to administer epinephrine may possess and administer epinephrine auto-injectors delivery systems from the supply as provided in this section . 4. Personnel authorized to administer epinephrine may provide or administer an epinephrine auto-injector delivery system from the facilityâs supply to an individual present at the facility if such personnel reasonably and in good faith believe the individual is having an anaphylactic reaction. 5. The following persons, provided they have acted reasonably and in good faith, shall not be liable for any injury arising from the provision, administration, or assistance in the administration of an epinephrine auto-injector delivery system as provided in this section : House File 2676, p. 6 a. Any personnel authorized to administer epinephrine who provide, administer, or assist in the administration of an epinephrine auto-injector delivery system to an individual present at the facility who such personnel believe to be having an anaphylactic reaction. b. The owner or operator of the facility. c. The prescriber of the epinephrine auto-injector delivery system . 6. The department, the board of medicine, the board of nursing, and the board of pharmacy shall adopt rules pursuant to chapter 17A to implement and administer this section , including but not limited to standards and procedures for the prescription, distribution, storage, replacement, and administration of epinephrine auto-injectors delivery systems , and for training and authorization to be required for personnel authorized to administer epinephrine. Sec. 13. Section 280.16, Code 2026, is amended to read as follows: 280.16 Self-administration of respiratory distress, asthma, or other airway constricting disease medication, epinephrine auto-injectors delivery systems , bronchodilator canisters, or bronchodilator canisters and spacers. 1. Definitions. For purposes of this section : a. âBronchodilatorâ means a bronchodilator as recommended by the department of health and human services for treatment of a studentâs respiratory distress, asthma, or other airway constricting disease. b. âBronchodilator canisterâ means a portable drug delivery device packaged with multiple premeasured doses of a bronchodilator. c. âEpinephrine auto-injector delivery system â means a device for immediate self-administration or administration by another trained individual of a measured dose of epinephrine to a person at risk of anaphylaxis , including epinephrine auto-injectors and epinephrine nasal sprays . d. â Licensed health care professionalâ means a person licensed under chapter 148 to practice medicine and surgery or osteopathic medicine and surgery, an advanced registered nurse practitioner licensed under chapter 152 or 152E and registered House File 2676, p. 7 with the board of nursing, or a physician assistant licensed under chapter 148C . e. âMedicationâ means a drug that meets the definition provided in section 126.2, subsection 8 , has an individual prescription label, is prescribed by a licensed health care professional for a student, and pertains to the studentâs respiratory distress, asthma, or other airway constricting disease, or risk of anaphylaxis, and includes but is not limited to a bronchodilator. f. âSelf-administrationâ means a studentâs discretionary use of medication prescribed by a licensed health care professional for the student. g. âSpacerâ means a holding chamber that is used to optimize the delivery of a bronchodilator to a personâs lungs. 2. The board of directors of a school district and the authorities in charge of an accredited nonpublic school shall permit the self-administration of medication or the use of a bronchodilator canister or bronchodilator canister and spacer by a student with respiratory distress, asthma, or other airway constricting disease or the use of an epinephrine auto-injector delivery system by a student with a risk of anaphylaxis if the following conditions are met: a. The studentâs parent or guardian provides to the school written authorization for the self-administration of medication, for the use of a bronchodilator canister or a bronchodilator canister and spacer, or for the use of an epinephrine auto-injector delivery system . b. The studentâs parent or guardian provides to the school a written statement from the studentâs licensed health care professional containing the following information: (1) The name and purpose of the medication, bronchodilator canister, bronchodilator canister and spacer, or epinephrine auto-injector delivery system . (2) The prescribed dosage. (3) The times at which or the special circumstances under which the medication, bronchodilator canister, bronchodilator canister and spacer, or epinephrine auto-injector delivery system is to be administered. c. The parent or guardian and the school meet the House File 2676, p. 8 requirements of subsection 3 . 3. The school district or accredited nonpublic school shall notify the parent or guardian of the student, in writing, that the school district or accredited nonpublic school and its employees are to incur no liability, except for gross negligence, as a result of any injury arising from self-administration of medication, use of a bronchodilator canister or a bronchodilator canister and spacer, or use of an epinephrine auto-injector delivery system by the student. The parent or guardian of the student shall sign a statement acknowledging that the school district or nonpublic school is to incur no liability, except for gross negligence, as a result of self-administration of medication, use of a bronchodilator canister or a bronchodilator canister and spacer, or use of an epinephrine auto-injector delivery system by the student. A school district or accredited nonpublic school and its employees acting reasonably and in good faith shall incur no liability for any improper use of medication, a bronchodilator canister, a bronchodilator canister and spacer, or an epinephrine auto-injector delivery system as defined in this section or for supervising, monitoring, or interfering with a studentâs self-administration of medication, use of a bronchodilator canister or a bronchodilator canister and spacer, or use of an epinephrine auto-injector delivery system as defined in this section . 4. The permission for self-administration of medication, for the use of a bronchodilator canister or a bronchodilator canister and spacer, or for the use of an epinephrine auto-injector delivery system is effective for the school year for which it is granted and shall be renewed each subsequent school year upon fulfillment of the requirements of this section . However, the parent or guardian shall immediately notify the school of any changes in the conditions listed under subsection 2 . 5. Provided that the requirements of this section are fulfilled, a student with respiratory distress, asthma, or other airway constricting disease may possess and use the studentâs medication and a student with a written statement from a licensed health care professional on file pursuant House File 2676, p. 9 to subsection 2 , paragraph âaâ , may use a bronchodilator canister, a bronchodilator canister and spacer, or an epinephrine auto-injector delivery system while in school, at school-sponsored activities, under the supervision of school personnel, and before or after normal school activities, such as while in before-school or after-school care on school-operated property. If the student misuses this privilege, the privilege may be withdrawn. A school district or nonpublic school shall notify a studentâs parent or guardian before withdrawing the privilege to use a bronchodilator canister, a bronchodilator canister and spacer, or an epinephrine auto-injector delivery system . 6. Information provided to the school under subsection 2 shall be kept on file in the office of the school nurse or, in the absence of a school nurse, the schoolâs administrator. 7. The Iowa school for the deaf and the institutions under the control of the department of health and human services as provided in section 218.1 are exempt from the provisions of this section . Sec. 14. Section 280.16A, Code 2026, is amended to read as follows: 280.16A Epinephrine auto-injector delivery system , bronchodilator canister, or bronchodilator canister and spacer supply. 1. For purposes of this section , unless the context otherwise requires: a. âBronchodilatorâ means the same as defined in section 280.16 . b. âBronchodilator canisterâ means the same as defined in section 280.16 . c. âEpinephrine auto-injector delivery system â means the same as provided in section 280.16 . d. âLicensed health care professionalâ means the same as provided in section 280.16 . e. âPersonnel authorized to administer epinephrine or a bronchodilatorâ means a school nurse or other employee of a school district or accredited nonpublic school trained and authorized to administer an epinephrine auto-injector delivery system , a bronchodilator canister, or a bronchodilator canister House File 2676, p. 10 and spacer. f. âSchool nurseâ means a registered nurse holding current licensure recognized by the board of nursing who practices in the school setting to promote and protect the health of the school population by using knowledge from the nursing, social, and public health sciences. g. âSpacerâ means the same as defined in section 280.16 . 2. Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, a licensed health care professional may prescribe epinephrine auto-injectors delivery systems , bronchodilator canisters, and bronchodilator canisters and spacers in the name of a school district or accredited nonpublic school to be maintained for use as provided in this section . 3. The board of directors in charge of each school district and the authorities in charge of each accredited nonpublic school may obtain a prescription for epinephrine auto-injectors delivery systems , bronchodilator canisters, and bronchodilator canisters and spacers and maintain a supply of such epinephrine auto-injectors delivery systems , bronchodilator canisters, and bronchodilator canisters and spacers in a secure location at each school for use as provided in this section . The board and the authorities shall replace epinephrine auto-injectors delivery systems , bronchodilator canisters, and bronchodilator canisters and spacers in the supply upon use or expiration. Personnel authorized to administer epinephrine or a bronchodilator may possess and administer epinephrine auto-injectors delivery systems , bronchodilator canisters, or bronchodilator canisters and spacers, as applicable, from the supply as provided in this section . 4. Personnel authorized to administer epinephrine or a bronchodilator may provide or administer an epinephrine auto-injector delivery system , a bronchodilator canister, or a bronchodilator canister and spacer, as applicable, from the schoolâs supply to a student or other individual if such personnel reasonably and in good faith believe the student or other individual is having an anaphylactic reaction or requires treatment for respiratory distress, asthma, or other airway constricting disease. 5. The following persons, provided they have acted House File 2676, p. 11 reasonably and in good faith, shall not be liable for any injury arising from the provision, administration, or assistance in the administration of an epinephrine auto-injector delivery system , a bronchodilator canister, or a bronchodilator canister and spacer as provided in this section : a. Any personnel authorized to administer epinephrine or a bronchodilator who, as applicable, provide, administer, or assist in the administration of an epinephrine auto-injector delivery system to a student or other individual present at the school who such personnel believe to be having an anaphylactic reaction or in the administration of a bronchodilator canister or a bronchodilator canister and spacer to a student or other individual present at the school who such personnel believe to require treatment for respiratory distress, asthma, or other airway constricting disease. b. A school district or accredited nonpublic school employing the personnel. c. The board of directors in charge of the school district or authorities in charge of the accredited nonpublic school. d. The prescriber of the epinephrine auto-injector delivery system , the bronchodilator canister, or the bronchodilator canister and spacer. 6. The department of education, the board of medicine, the board of nursing, and the board of pharmacy shall, in consultation with an organization representing school nurses, adopt rules pursuant to chapter 17A to implement and administer this section , including but not limited to standards and procedures for the prescription, distribution, storage, disposal, replacement, and administration of epinephrine auto-injectors delivery systems , bronchodilator canisters, and bronchodilator canisters and spacers, and for training and authorization to be required for personnel authorized to administer epinephrine or a bronchodilator. DIVISION VII IVERMECTIN ââ OVER-THE-COUNTER AVAILABILITY Sec. 15. NEW SECTION . 126.24 Ivermectin ââ prescription drug order not required. 1. A pharmacist or pharmacy may distribute ivermectin for human consumption as an over-the-counter medicine. House File 2676, p. 12 2. A pharmacist or pharmacy shall not be subject to professional discipline or civil or criminal penalties for the distribution of ivermectin pursuant to this section. DIVISION VIII STUDENT INSTRUCTIONAL TECHNOLOGY STANDARDS Sec. 16. Section 256E.7, subsection 2, Code 2026, is amended by adding the following new paragraph: NEW PARAGRAPH . 0s. Be subject to and comply with the requirements of section 279.89 relating to student instructional technology standards in the same manner as a school district. Sec. 17. Section 256F.4, subsection 2, Code 2026, is amended by adding the following new paragraph: NEW PARAGRAPH . w. Be subject to and comply with the requirements of section 279.89 relating to student instructional technology standards in the same manner as a school district. Sec. 18. NEW SECTION . 279.89 Student instructional technology standards. 1. As used in this section, unless the context otherwise requires: a. âDigital instructionâ means lessons, assignments, assessments, or instructional activities delivered through instructional technology. b. âInstructional technologyâ means a laptop, tablet, computer, smart device, software platform, or other similar device or platform used for student learning. c. âOne-to-one digital device programâ means a program through which a school district provides or assigns a digital device to each student for instructional use. 2. a. For students enrolled in grades kindergarten through five, digital instruction shall not exceed sixty minutes per school day. b. The following uses shall not count toward the daily limit: (1) Use required pursuant to an individualized education program or a plan developed pursuant to section 504 of the federal Rehabilitation Act of 1973. (2) Assistive or adaptive technology used to provide a House File 2676, p. 13 student access to instruction or to accommodate differing student abilities. (3) Teacher-directed demonstrations using a projector, smartboard, or similar display device when students are not individually operating a digital device. (4) State assessments, screening, progress monitoring, and local diagnostic assessments that require the use of a one-to-one digital device. (5) Dedicated computer science and technology curriculum. 3. a. The board of directors of each school district shall adopt a written technology use policy applicable to grades kindergarten through five. b. The policy shall include all of the following: (1) The districtâs daily digital instruction limits. (2) Notice of a parentâs or guardianâs right to request additional reductions in the parentâs or guardianâs childâs digital instruction. (3) A statement that instructional technology shall support, and not supplant, foundational learning. (4) A prohibition on the use of digital devices during recess. c. The policy shall be published on each elementary schoolâs internet site. 4. a. Prior to adopting or renewing a one-to-one digital device program for any grade level, the board of directors of a school district shall complete a technology adoption checklist that documents consideration of all of the following: (1) The instructional purpose of the device. (2) Age appropriateness of the device and associated software. (3) Content-filtering limitations and the districtâs capacity to mitigate those limitations. (4) Whether student data is collected, stored, or shared, and the nature of such data practices. b. The checklist shall be retained by the board and made available to the department of education upon request for audit or compliance purposes. 5. This section shall not apply to students enrolled in an online learning program operating pursuant to section 256.43. House File 2676, p. 14 6. This section does not limit the authority of a school district or accredited nonpublic school under section 279.10, subsection 1, regarding provision of instruction over the internet to meet the minimum school calendar requirements. Sec. 19. DEPARTMENT OF EDUCATION ââ WORKING GROUP ââ IMPACT OF TECHNOLOGY ON COGNITIVE LEARNING. 1. The department of education, in collaboration with the department of health and human services, shall convene and provide administrative support to a working group that shall examine research related to the impact of school-provided technology on the cognitive function and academic performance of students in grades six through twelve. For purposes of this section, âschool-provided technologyâ includes laptop computers, online learning management systems, and classroom slide show presentations. 2. The membership of the working group shall include but not be limited to educators, mental health professionals, and parents of school-age children. 3. Any expenses incurred by a member of the working group shall be the responsibility of the individual member or the respective entity represented by the member. 4. The working group shall submit its findings and recommendations in a report to the general assembly by December 31, 2026. The report shall include recommendations on best practices related to the use of school-provided technology in educational contexts with a focus on ways to mitigate possible negative impacts on the social and behavioral development, attention span, mental concentration, and learning ability of students in grades six through twelve. DIVISION IX PRESIDENTIAL PHYSICAL FITNESS TEST Sec. 20. Section 256.11, subsection 3, paragraph a, subparagraph (6), Code 2026, is amended to read as follows: (6) Physical education. The physical education curriculum shall include an assessment of the physical fitness of students who are physically able using the presidential physical fitness test. Sec. 21. Section 256.11, subsection 4, paragraph a, subparagraph (8), Code 2026, is amended to read as follows: House File 2676, p. 15 (8) Physical education. The physical education curriculum shall include an assessment of the physical fitness of students who are physically able using the presidential physical fitness test. Sec. 22. Section 256.11, subsection 5, paragraph g, Code 2026, is amended to read as follows: g. (1) All students physically able shall be required to participate in a minimum of one-eighth unit of physical education activities during each semester they are enrolled in school except as otherwise provided in this paragraph. The physical education activities must satisfy all of the following requirements: (a) Emphasize leisure time activities which will benefit the student outside the school environment and after graduation from high school. (b) Include an assessment of the physical fitness of students who are physically able using the presidential physical fitness test. (2) (a) A student who meets the requirements of this paragraph subparagraph shall be excused from the physical education activities requirement under subparagraph (1) by the principal of the school in which the student is enrolled if the parent or guardian of the student requests in writing that the student be excused from the physical education activities requirement. A student who wishes to be excused from the physical education activities requirement must be seeking to be excused in order to enroll in academic courses not otherwise available to the student, or be enrolled or participating in any of the following: (a) (i) A work-based learning program or other educational program authorized by the school which requires the student to leave the school premises for specified periods of time during the school day. (b) (ii) An activity that is sponsored by the school in which the student is enrolled which requires at least as much physical activity per week as one-eighth unit of physical education activities . (2) (b) The principal of the school shall inform the superintendent of the school district or nonpublic school that House File 2676, p. 16 the student has been excused. Physical education activities shall emphasize leisure time activities which will benefit the student outside the school environment and after graduation from high school. (3) A student who is enrolled in a junior reserve officersâ training corps shall not be required to participate in physical education activities under subparagraph (1) or to meet the physical activity requirements of subsection 6 , paragraph âbâ , subparagraph (2), but shall receive one-eighth unit of physical education activities credit for each semester, or the equivalent, of junior reserve officersâ training corps the student completes. Sec. 23. CONTINGENT EFFECTIVE DATE. This division of this Act takes effect upon the issuance of final guidance for administration of the presidential physical fitness test by the federal government. The department of education shall inform the Iowa Code editor upon the issuance of final guidance for administration of the presidential physical fitness test by the federal government. DIVISION X STUDENT PHYSICAL ACTIVITY REQUIREMENTS Sec. 24. Section 256.11, subsection 5, paragraph g, subparagraph (3), Code 2026, is amended to read as follows: (3) A student who is enrolled in a junior reserve officersâ training corps shall not be required to participate in physical education activities under subparagraph (1) or to meet the physical activity requirements of subsection 6 , paragraph âbâ , subparagraph (2) (3) , but shall receive one-eighth unit of physical education credit for each semester, or the equivalent, of junior reserve officersâ training corps the student completes. Sec. 25. Section 256.11, subsection 6, paragraph b, Code 2026, is amended to read as follows: b. (1) All physically able students in kindergarten through grade five four shall be required to engage in a physical activity for a minimum of thirty forty minutes per school day. (2) All physically able students in grade five shall be required to engage in a physical activity for a minimum of thirty minutes per school day. House File 2676, p. 17 (2) (3) All physically able students in grades six through twelve shall be required to engage in a physical activity for a minimum of one hundred twenty minutes per week. A student participating in an organized and supervised athletic program or non-school-sponsored extracurricular activity which requires the student to participate in physical activity for a minimum of one hundred twenty minutes per week is exempt from the requirements of this subparagraph. (3) (4) The department shall collaborate with stakeholders on the development of daily physical activity requirements and the development of models that describe ways in which school districts and schools may incorporate the physical activity requirement of this paragraph into the educational program. A school district or accredited nonpublic school shall not reduce instructional time for academic courses in order to meet the requirements of this paragraph. Sec. 26. Section 256.11, subsection 18, Code 2026, is amended to read as follows: 18. The board of directors of a school district and the authorities in charge of an accredited nonpublic school shall each establish a policy to award credit toward graduation to a student if the student participates in the legislative page program at the state capitol for a regular session of the general assembly. The student shall be excused from the physical education requirements of subsection 5 , paragraph âgâ , subparagraph (1), and is exempt from the physical activity requirements of subsection 6 , paragraph âbâ , subparagraph (2) (3) , while participating in the legislative page program. The student must complete the graduation requirements of section 256.7, subsection 26 , paragraph âaâ , but participation in the legislative page program for a complete regular session of the general assembly shall count as one-half unit of social studies credit required for purposes of section 256.7, subsection 26 , paragraph âaâ . DIVISION XI PSYCHOLOGY INTERJURISDICTIONAL COMPACT Sec. 27. NEW SECTION . 147M.1 Psychology interjurisdictional compact. The psychology interjurisdictional compact is enacted into House File 2676, p. 18 law and entered into by this state with all states legally joining in the compact in the form substantially as follows: 1. Article I ââ Purpose. a. The party states find that: (1) States license psychologists, in order to protect the public through verification of education, training, and experience, and ensure accountability for professional practice. (2) This compact is intended to regulate the day-to-day practice of telepsychology, in which psychological services are provided using telecommunication technologies, by psychologists across state boundaries in the performance of their psychological practice as assigned by an appropriate authority. (3) This compact is intended to regulate the temporary in-person, face-to-face practice of psychology by psychologists across state boundaries for thirty days within a calendar year in the performance of their psychological practice as assigned by an appropriate authority. (4) This compact is intended to authorize state psychology regulatory authorities to afford legal recognition, in a manner consistent with the terms of the compact, to psychologists licensed in another state. (5) This compact recognizes that states have a vested interest in protecting the publicâs health and safety through their licensing and regulation of psychologists and that such state regulation will best protect public health and safety. (6) This compact does not apply when a psychologist is licensed in both the home and receiving states. (7) This compact does not apply to permanent in-person, face-to-face practice, but it does allow for authorization of temporary psychological practice. b. Consistent with these principles, this compact is designed to achieve the following purposes and objectives: (1) Increase public access to professional psychological services by allowing for telepsychological practice across state lines as well as temporary in-person, face-to-face services into a state in which the psychologist is not licensed to practice psychology. (2) Enhance the statesâ ability to protect the publicâs House File 2676, p. 19 health and safety, especially client-patient safety. (3) Encourage the cooperation of compact states in the areas of psychology licensure and regulation. (4) Facilitate the exchange of information between compact states regarding psychologist licensure, adverse actions, and disciplinary history. (5) Promote compliance with the laws governing psychological practice in each compact state. (6) Invest all compact states with the authority to hold licensed psychologists accountable through the mutual recognition of compact state licenses. 2. Article II ââ Definitions. a. âAdverse actionâ means any action taken by a state psychology regulatory authority which finds a violation of a statute or regulation that is identified by the state psychology regulatory authority as discipline and is a matter of public record. b. âAssociation of state and provincial psychology boardsâ means the recognized membership organization composed of state and provincial psychology regulatory authorities responsible for the licensure and registration of psychologists throughout the United States and Canada. c. âAuthority to practice interjurisdictional telepsychologyâ means a licensed psychologistâs authority to practice telepsychology, within the limits authorized under this compact, in another compact state. d. âBylawsâ means those bylaws established by the psychology interjurisdictional compact commission pursuant to article X for its governance, or for directing and controlling its actions and conduct. e. âClient-patientâ means the recipient of psychological services, whether psychological services are delivered in the context of health care, corporate, supervision, or consulting services. f. âCommissionerâ means the voting representative appointed by each state psychology regulatory authority pursuant to article X. g. âCompact stateâ means a state, the District of Columbia, or United States territory that has enacted this compact House File 2676, p. 20 legislation and which has not withdrawn pursuant to article XIII, or been terminated pursuant to article XII. h. âConfidentialityâ means the principle that data or information is not made available or disclosed to unauthorized persons or processes. i. âCoordinated licensure information systemâ or âcoordinated databaseâ means an integrated process for collecting, storing, and sharing information on psychologistsâ licensure and enforcement activities related to psychology licensure laws, which is administered by the recognized membership organization composed of state and provincial psychology regulatory authorities. j. âDayâ means any part of a day in which psychological work is performed. k. âDistant stateâ means the compact state where a psychologist is physically present, not through the use of telecommunications technologies, to provide temporary in-person, face-to-face psychological services. l. âE.Passportâ means a certificate issued by the association of state and provincial psychology boards that promotes the standardization in the criteria of interjurisdictional telepsychology practice and facilitates the process for licensed psychologists to provide telepsychological services across state lines. m. âExecutive boardâ means a group of directors elected or appointed to act on behalf of, and within the powers granted to them by, the commission. n. âHome stateâ means a compact state where a psychologist is licensed to practice psychology. If the psychologist is licensed in more than one compact state and is practicing under the authorization to practice interjurisdictional telepsychology, the home state is the compact state where the psychologist is physically present when the telepsychological services are delivered. If the psychologist is licensed in more than one compact state and is practicing under the temporary authorization to practice, the home state is any compact state where the psychologist is licensed. o. âIdentity history summaryâ means a summary of information retained by the federal bureau of investigation (FBI), or other House File 2676, p. 21 designee with similar authority, in connection with arrests and, in some instances, federal employment, naturalization, or military service. p. âIn-person, face-to-faceâ means interactions in which the psychologist and the client-patient are in the same physical space and which does not include interactions that may occur through the use of telecommunication technologies. q. âInterjurisdictional practice certificateâ or âIPCâ means a certificate issued by the association of state and provincial psychology boards that grants temporary authority to practice based on notification to the state psychology regulatory authority of intention to practice temporarily, and verification of oneâs qualifications for such practice. r. âLicenseâ means authorization by a state psychology regulatory authority to engage in the independent practice of psychology, which would be unlawful without the authorization. s. âNoncompact stateâ means any state which is not at the time a compact state. t. âPsychologistâ means an individual licensed for the independent practice of psychology. u. âPsychology interjurisdictional compact commissionâ or âcommissionâ means the national administration of which all compact states are members. v. âReceiving stateâ means a compact state where the client-patient is physically located when the telepsychological services are delivered. w. âRuleâ means a written statement by the psychology interjurisdictional compact commission promulgated pursuant to article XI that is of general applicability, implements, interprets, or prescribes a policy or provision of this compact, or an organizational, procedural, or practice requirement of the commission and has the force and effect of statutory law in a compact state, and includes the amendment, repeal, or suspension of an existing rule. x. âSignificant investigatory informationâ means any of the following: (1) Investigative information that a state psychology regulatory authority, after a preliminary inquiry that includes notification and an opportunity to respond if required by state House File 2676, p. 22 law, has reason to believe, if proven true, would indicate more than a violation of state statute or ethics code that would be considered more substantial than a minor infraction. (2) Investigative information that indicates that the psychologist represents an immediate threat to public health and safety regardless of whether the psychologist has been notified or had an opportunity to respond. y. âStateâ means a state, commonwealth, territory, or possession of the United States, or the District of Columbia. z. âState psychology regulatory authorityâ means the board, office, or other agency with the legislative mandate to license and regulate the practice of psychology. aa. âTelepsychologyâ means the provision of psychological services using telecommunication technologies. ab. âTemporary authorization to practiceâ means a licensed psychologistâs authority to conduct temporary in-person, face-to-face practice, within the limits authorized under this compact, in another compact state. ac. âTemporary in-person, face-to-face practiceâ means where a psychologist is physically present, not through the use of telecommunications technologies, in the distant state to provide for the practice of psychology for thirty days within a calendar year and based on notification to the distant state. 3. Article III ââ Home state licensure. a. The home state shall be a compact state where a psychologist is licensed to practice psychology. b. A psychologist may hold one or more compact state licenses at a time. If the psychologist is licensed in more than one compact state, the home state is the compact state where the psychologist is physically present when the services are delivered as authorized by the authority to practice interjurisdictional telepsychology under the terms of this compact. c. Any compact state may require a psychologist not previously licensed in a compact state to obtain and retain a license to be authorized to practice in the compact state under circumstances not authorized by the authority to practice interjurisdictional telepsychology under the terms of this compact. House File 2676, p. 23 d. Any compact state may require a psychologist to obtain and retain a license to be authorized to practice in a compact state under circumstances not authorized by temporary authorization to practice under the terms of this compact. e. A home stateâs license authorizes a psychologist to practice in a receiving state under the authority to practice interjurisdictional telepsychology only if the compact state meets all of the following requirements: (1) Currently requires the psychologist to hold an active E.Passport. (2) Has a mechanism in place for receiving and investigating complaints about licensed individuals. (3) Notifies the commission, in compliance with the terms herein, of any adverse action or significant investigatory information regarding a licensed individual. (4) Requires an identity history summary of all applicants at initial licensure, including the use of the results of fingerprints or other biometric data checks compliant with the requirements of the federal bureau of investigation (FBI), or other designee with similar authority, no later than ten years after activation of the this compact. (5) Complies with the bylaws and rules of the commission. f. A home stateâs license grants temporary authorization to practice to a psychologist in a distant state only if the compact state meets all of the following requirements: (1) Currently requires the psychologist to hold an active IPC. (2) Has a mechanism in place for receiving and investigating complaints about licensed individuals. (3) Notifies the commission, in compliance with the terms herein, of any adverse action or significant investigatory information regarding a licensed individual. (4) Requires an identity history summary of all applicants at initial licensure, including the use of the results of fingerprints or other biometric data checks compliant with the requirements of the federal bureau of investigation (FBI), or other designee with similar authority, no later than ten years after activation of this compact. (5) Complies with the bylaws and rules of the commission. House File 2676, p. 24 4. Article IV ââ Compact privilege to practice telepsychology. a. Compact states shall recognize the right of a psychologist, licensed in a compact state in conformance with article III, to practice telepsychology in receiving states in which the psychologist is not licensed, under the authority to practice interjurisdictional telepsychology as provided in this compact. b. To exercise the authority to practice interjurisdictional telepsychology under the terms and provisions of this compact, a psychologist licensed to practice in a compact state shall meet all of the following requirements: (1) Hold a graduate degree in psychology from an institution of higher education that was either of the following, at the time the degree was awarded: (a) Regionally accredited by an accrediting body recognized by the United States department of education to grant graduate degrees, or authorized by provincial statute or royal charter to grant doctoral degrees. (b) A foreign college or university deemed to be equivalent to subparagraph (1), subparagraph division (a), by a foreign credential evaluation service that is a member of the national association of credential evaluation services or by a recognized foreign credential evaluation service. (2) Hold a graduate degree in psychology that meets all of the following criteria: (a) The program, wherever it may be administratively housed, must be clearly identified and labeled as a psychology program. Such a program must specify in pertinent institutional catalogues and brochures its intent to educate and train professional psychologists. (b) The psychology program must stand as a recognizable, coherent, organizational entity within the institution. (c) There must be a clear authority and primary responsibility for the core and specialty areas whether or not the program cuts across administrative lines. (d) The program must consist of an integrated, organized sequence of study. (e) There must be an identifiable psychology House File 2676, p. 25 faculty sufficient in size and breadth to carry out its responsibilities. (f) The designated director of the program must be a psychologist and a member of the core faculty. (g) The program must have an identifiable body of students who are matriculated in that program for a degree. (h) The program must include supervised practicum, internship, or field training appropriate to the practice of psychology. (i) The curriculum shall encompass a minimum of three academic years of full-time graduate study for doctoral degrees and a minimum of one academic year of full-time graduate study for masterâs degrees. (j) The program includes an acceptable residency as defined by the rules of the commission. (3) Possess a current, full, and unrestricted license to practice psychology in a home state which is a compact state. (4) Have no history of adverse action that violates the rules of the commission. (5) Have no criminal record history reported on an identity history summary that violates the rules of the commission. (6) Possess a current, active E.Passport. (7) Provide attestations in regard to areas of intended practice, conformity with standards of practice, competence in telepsychology technology; criminal background; and knowledge and adherence to legal requirements in the home and receiving states, and provide a release of information to allow for primary source verification in a manner specified by the commission. (8) Meet other criteria as defined by the rules of the commission. c. The home state maintains authority over the license of any psychologist practicing into a receiving state under the authority to practice interjurisdictional telepsychology. d. A psychologist practicing into a receiving state under the authority to practice interjurisdictional telepsychology shall be subject to the receiving stateâs scope of practice. A receiving state may, in accordance with that stateâs due process law, limit or revoke a psychologistâs authority to House File 2676, p. 26 practice interjurisdictional telepsychology in the receiving state and may take any other necessary actions under the receiving stateâs applicable law to protect the health and safety of the receiving stateâs citizens. If a receiving state takes action, the state shall promptly notify the home state and the commission. e. If a psychologistâs license in any home state or another compact state, or any authority to practice interjurisdictional telepsychology in any receiving state, is restricted, suspended, or otherwise limited, the E.Passport shall be revoked and the psychologist shall not be eligible to practice telepsychology in a compact state under the authority to practice interjurisdictional telepsychology. 5. Article V ââ Compact temporary authorization to practice. a. Compact states shall also recognize the right of a psychologist, licensed in a compact state in conformance with article III, to practice temporarily in distant states in which the psychologist is not licensed, as provided in this compact. b. To exercise the temporary authorization to practice under the terms and provisions of this compact, a psychologist licensed to practice in a compact state shall meet all of the following requirements: (1) Hold a graduate degree in psychology from an institution of higher education that was either of the following, at the time the degree was awarded: (a) Regionally accredited by an accrediting body recognized by the United States department of education to grant graduate degrees, or authorized by provincial statute or royal charter to grant doctoral degrees. (b) A foreign college or university deemed to be equivalent to subparagraph (1), subparagraph division (a), by a foreign credential evaluation service that is a member of the national association of credential evaluation services or by a recognized foreign credential evaluation service. (2) Hold a graduate degree in psychology that meets all of the following criteria: (a) The program, wherever it may be administratively housed, must be clearly identified and labeled as a psychology program. Such a program must specify in pertinent House File 2676, p. 27 institutional catalogues and brochures its intent to educate and train professional psychologists. (b) The psychology program must stand as a recognizable, coherent, organizational entity within the institution. (c) There must be a clear authority and primary responsibility for the core and specialty areas whether or not the program cuts across administrative lines. (d) The program must consist of an integrated, organized sequence of study. (e) There must be an identifiable psychology faculty sufficient in size and breadth to carry out its responsibilities. (f) The designated director of the program must be a psychologist and a member of the core faculty. (g) The program must have an identifiable body of students who are matriculated in that program for a degree. (h) The program must include supervised practicum, internship, or field training appropriate to the practice of psychology. (i) The curriculum shall encompass a minimum of three academic years of full-time graduate study for doctoral degrees and a minimum of one academic year of full-time graduate study for masterâs degrees. (j) The program includes an acceptable residency as defined by the rules of the commission. (3) Possess a current, full, and unrestricted license to practice psychology in a home state which is a compact state. (4) Have no history of adverse action that violates the rules of the commission. (5) Have no criminal record history that violates the rules of the commission. (6) Possess a current, active IPC. (7) Provide attestations in regard to areas of intended practice and work experience and provide a release of information to allow for primary source verification in a manner specified by the commission. (8) Meet other criteria as defined by the rules of the commission. c. A psychologist practicing into a distant state under the House File 2676, p. 28 temporary authorization to practice shall practice within the scope of practice authorized by the distant state. d. A psychologist practicing into a distant state under the temporary authorization to practice shall be subject to the distant stateâs authority and law. A distant state may, in accordance with that stateâs due process law, limit or revoke a psychologistâs temporary authorization to practice in the distant state and may take any other necessary actions under the distant stateâs applicable law to protect the health and safety of the distant stateâs citizens. If a distant state takes action, the state shall promptly notify the home state and the commission. e. If a psychologistâs license in any home state, another compact state, or any temporary authorization to practice in any distant state, is restricted, suspended, or otherwise limited, the IPC shall be revoked and the psychologist shall not be eligible to practice in a compact state under the temporary authorization to practice. 6. Article VI ââ Conditions of telepsychology practice in a receiving state. A psychologist may practice in a receiving state under the authority to practice interjurisdictional telepsychology only in the performance of the scope of practice for psychology as assigned by an appropriate state psychology regulatory authority, as defined in the rules of the commission, and under the following circumstances: a. The psychologist initiates a client-patient contact in a home state via telecommunications technologies with a client-patient in a receiving state. b. Other conditions regarding telepsychology as determined by rules promulgated by the commission. 7. Article VII ââ Adverse actions. a. A home state shall have the power to impose adverse action against a psychologistâs license issued by the home state. A distant state shall have the power to take adverse action on a psychologistâs temporary authorization to practice within that distant state. b. A receiving state may take adverse action on a psychologistâs authority to practice interjurisdictional telepsychology within that receiving state. A home state may House File 2676, p. 29 take adverse action against a psychologist based on an adverse action taken by a distant state regarding temporary in-person, face-to-face practice. c. If a home state takes adverse action against a psychologistâs license, that psychologistâs authority to practice interjurisdictional telepsychology is terminated and the E.Passport is revoked. Furthermore, that psychologistâs temporary authorization to practice is terminated and the IPC is revoked. (1) All home state disciplinary orders which impose adverse action shall be reported to the commission in accordance with the rules promulgated by the commission. A compact state shall report adverse actions in accordance with the rules of the commission. (2) In the event discipline is reported on a psychologist, the psychologist shall not be eligible for telepsychology or temporary in-person, face-to-face practice in accordance with the rules of the commission. (3) Other actions may be imposed as determined by the rules promulgated by the commission. d. A home stateâs psychology regulatory authority shall investigate and take appropriate action with respect to reported inappropriate conduct engaged in by a licensee which occurred in a receiving state as it would if such conduct had occurred by a licensee within the home state. In such cases, the home stateâs law shall control in determining any adverse action against a psychologistâs license. e. A distant stateâs psychology regulatory authority shall investigate and take appropriate action with respect to reported inappropriate conduct engaged in by a psychologist practicing under temporary authorization to practice which occurred in that distant state as it would if such conduct had occurred by a licensee within the home state. In such cases, the distant stateâs law shall control in determining any adverse action against a psychologistâs temporary authorization to practice. f. Nothing in this compact shall override a compact stateâs decision that a psychologistâs participation in an alternative program may be used in lieu of adverse action and that such House File 2676, p. 30 participation shall remain nonpublic if required by the compact stateâs law. Compact states shall require psychologists who enter any alternative programs to not provide telepsychology services under the authority to practice interjurisdictional telepsychology or provide temporary psychological services under the temporary authorization to practice in any other compact state during the term of the alternative program. g. No other judicial or administrative remedies shall be available to a psychologist in the event a compact state imposes an adverse action pursuant to paragraph âcâ . 8. Article VIII ââ Additional authorities invested in a compact stateâs psychology regulatory authority. In addition to any other powers granted under state law, a compact stateâs psychology regulatory authority shall have the authority under this compact to do all of the following: a. Issue subpoenas, for both hearings and investigations, which require the attendance and testimony of witnesses and the production of evidence. Subpoenas issued by a compact stateâs psychology regulatory authority for the attendance and testimony of witnesses or the production of evidence from another compact state shall be enforced in the latter state by any court of competent jurisdiction, according to that courtâs practice and procedure in considering subpoenas issued in its own proceedings. The issuing state psychology regulatory authority shall pay any witness fees, travel expenses, mileage, and other fees required by the service statutes of the state where the witnesses or evidence are located. b. Issue cease and desist or injunctive relief orders to revoke a psychologistâs authority to practice interjurisdictional telepsychology or temporary authorization to practice. c. During the course of any investigation, a psychologist may not change the psychologistâs home state licensure. A home state psychology regulatory authority is authorized to complete any pending investigations of a psychologist and to take any actions appropriate under its law. The home state psychology regulatory authority shall promptly report the conclusions of such investigations to the commission. Once an investigation has been completed, and pending the House File 2676, p. 31 outcome of said investigation, the psychologist may change the psychologistâs home state licensure. The commission shall promptly notify the new home state of any such decisions as provided in the rules of the commission. All information provided to the commission or distributed by compact states pursuant to the psychologist shall be confidential, filed under seal, and used for investigatory or disciplinary matters. The commission may create additional rules for mandated or discretionary sharing of information by compact states. 9. Article IX ââ Coordinated licensure information system. a. The commission shall provide for the development and maintenance of a coordinated licensure information system and reporting system containing licensure and disciplinary action information on all psychologists individuals to whom this compact is applicable in all compact states as defined by the rules of the commission. b. Notwithstanding any other provision of state law to the contrary, a compact state shall submit a uniform data set to the coordinated database on all licensees as required by the rules of the commission, including all of the following: (1) Identifying information. (2) Licensure data. (3) Significant investigatory information. (4) Adverse actions against a psychologistâs license. (5) An indicator that a psychologistâs authority to practice interjurisdictional telepsychology or temporary authorization to practice is revoked. (6) Nonconfidential information related to alternative program participation information. (7) Any denial of application for licensure, and the reasons for such denial. (8) Other information which may facilitate the administration of this compact, as determined by the rules of the commission. c. The coordinated database administrator shall promptly notify all compact states of any adverse action taken against, or significant investigative information on, any licensee in a compact state. d. Compact states reporting information to the coordinated House File 2676, p. 32 database may designate information that may not be shared with the public without the express permission of the compact state reporting the information. e. Any information submitted to the coordinated database that is subsequently required to be expunged by the law of the compact state reporting the information shall be removed from the coordinated database. 10. Article X ââ Establishment of the psychology interjurisdictional compact commission. a. The compact states hereby create and establish a joint public agency known as the psychology interjurisdictional compact commission. (1) The commission is a body politic and an instrumentality of the compact states. (2) Venue is proper and judicial proceedings by or against the commission shall be brought solely and exclusively in a court of competent jurisdiction where the principal office of the commission is located. The commission may waive venue and jurisdictional defenses to the extent it adopts or consents to participate in alternative dispute resolution proceedings. (3) Nothing in this compact shall be construed to be a waiver of sovereign immunity. b. Membership, voting, and meetings. (1) The commission shall consist of one voting representative appointed by each compact state who shall serve as that stateâs commissioner. The state psychology regulatory authority shall appoint its delegate. This delegate shall be empowered to act on behalf of the compact state. This delegate shall be limited to one of the following: (a) The executive director, executive secretary, or similar executive. (b) A current member of the state psychology regulatory authority of a compact state. (c) A designee empowered with the appropriate delegate authority to act on behalf of the compact state. (2) Any commissioner may be removed or suspended from office as provided by the law of the state from which the commissioner is appointed. Any vacancy occurring in the commission shall be filled in accordance with the laws of the compact state in House File 2676, p. 33 which the vacancy exists. (3) Each commissioner shall be entitled to one vote with regard to the promulgation of rules and creation of bylaws and shall otherwise have an opportunity to participate in the business and affairs of the commission. A commissioner shall vote in person or by such other means as provided in the bylaws. The bylaws may provide for commissionersâ participation in meetings by telephone or other means of communication. (4) The commission shall meet at least once during each calendar year. Additional meetings shall be held as set forth in the bylaws. (5) All meetings shall be open to the public, and public notice of meetings shall be given in the same manner as required under the rulemaking provisions in article XI. (6) The commission may convene in a closed, nonpublic meeting if the commission must discuss any of the following: (a) Noncompliance of a compact state with its obligations under this compact. (b) The employment, compensation, discipline, or other personnel matters, practices, or procedures related to specific employees or other matters related to the commissionâs internal personnel practices and procedures. (c) Current, threatened, or reasonably anticipated litigation against the commission. (d) Negotiation of contracts for the purchase or sale of goods, services, or real estate. (e) Accusation against any person of a crime or formal censure of any person. (f) Disclosure of trade secrets or commercial or financial information which is privileged or confidential. (g) Disclosure of information of a personal nature where disclosure would constitute a clearly unwarranted invasion of personal privacy. (h) Disclosure of investigatory records compiled for law enforcement purposes. (i) Disclosure of information related to any investigatory reports prepared by or on behalf of or for use of the commission or other committee charged with responsibility for House File 2676, p. 34 investigation or determination of compliance issues pursuant to the compact. (j) Matters specifically exempted from disclosure by federal and state statute. (7) If a meeting, or portion of a meeting, is closed pursuant to subparagraph (6), the commissionâs legal counsel or designee shall certify that the meeting may be closed and shall reference each relevant exempting provision. The commission shall keep minutes which fully and clearly describe all matters discussed in a meeting and shall provide a full and accurate summary of actions taken, of any person participating in the meeting, and the reasons therefore, including a description of the views expressed. All documents considered in connection with an action shall be identified in such minutes. All minutes and documents of a closed meeting shall remain under seal, subject to release only by a majority vote of the commission or order of a court of competent jurisdiction. c. The commission shall, by a majority vote of the commissioners, prescribe bylaws or rules to govern its conduct as may be necessary or appropriate to carry out the purposes and exercise the powers of this compact, including but not limited to or providing for all of the following: (1) Establishing the fiscal year of the commission. (2) Providing reasonable standards and procedures for all of the following: (a) The establishment and meetings of other committees. (b) Governing any general or specific delegation of any authority or function of the commission. (3) Providing reasonable procedures for calling and conducting meetings of the commission, ensuring reasonable advance notice of all meetings and providing an opportunity for attendance of such meetings by interested parties, with enumerated exceptions designed to protect the publicâs interest, the privacy of individuals of such proceedings, and proprietary information, including trade secrets. The commission may meet in closed session only after a majority of the commissioners vote to close a meeting to the public in whole or in part. As soon as practicable, the commission shall make public a copy of the vote to close the meeting revealing House File 2676, p. 35 the vote of each commissioner with no proxy votes allowed. (4) Establishing the titles, duties, and authority and reasonable procedures for the election of the officers of the commission. (5) Providing reasonable standards and procedures for the establishment of the personnel policies and programs of the commission. Notwithstanding any civil service or other similar law of any compact state, the bylaws shall exclusively govern the personnel policies and programs of the commission. (6) Promulgating a code of ethics to address permissible and prohibited activities of commission members and employees. (7) Providing a mechanism for concluding the operations of the commission and the equitable disposition of any surplus funds that may exist after the termination of the compact after the payment or reserving of all of its debts and obligations. (8) The commission shall publish its bylaws in a convenient form and file a copy thereof and a copy of any amendment thereto, with the appropriate agency or officer in each of the compact states. (9) The commission shall maintain its financial records in accordance with the bylaws. (10) The commission shall meet and take such actions as are consistent with the provisions of this compact and the bylaws. d. The commission shall have all of the following powers: (1) The authority to promulgate uniform rules to facilitate and coordinate implementation and administration of this compact. The rules shall have the force and effect of law and shall be binding in all compact states. (2) To bring and prosecute legal proceedings or actions in the name of the commission, provided that the standing of any state psychology regulatory authority or other regulatory body responsible for psychology licensure to sue or be sued under applicable law shall not be affected. (3) To purchase and maintain insurance and bonds. (4) To borrow, accept, or contract for services of personnel, including but not limited to employees of a compact state. (5) To hire employees, elect or appoint officers, fix compensation, define duties, grant such individuals appropriate House File 2676, p. 36 authority to carry out the purposes of the compact, and to establish the commissionâs personnel policies and programs relating to conflicts of interest, qualifications of personnel, and other related personnel matters. (6) To accept any and all appropriate donations and grants of money, equipment, supplies, materials and services, and to receive, utilize, and dispose of the same; provided that at all times the commission shall strive to avoid any appearance of impropriety or conflict of interest. (7) To lease, purchase, accept appropriate gifts or donations of, or otherwise to own, hold, improve, or use, any property, real, personal, or mixed; provided that at all times the commission shall strive to avoid any appearance of impropriety. (8) To sell, convey, mortgage, pledge, lease, exchange, abandon, or otherwise dispose of any property real, personal, or mixed. (9) To establish a budget and make expenditures. (10) To borrow money. (11) To appoint committees, including advisory committees comprised of members, state regulators, state legislators or their representatives, and consumer representatives, and such other interested persons as may be designated in this compact and the bylaws. (12) To provide and receive information from, and to cooperate with, law enforcement agencies. (13) To adopt and use an official seal. (14) To perform such other functions as may be necessary or appropriate to achieve the purposes of this compact consistent with the state regulation of psychology licensure, temporary in-person, face-to-face practice, and telepsychology practice. e. The executive board. (1) The elected officers shall serve as the executive board, which shall have the power to act on behalf of the commission according to the terms of this compact. (2) The executive board shall be comprised of the following six members: (a) Five voting members who are elected from the current membership of the commission by the commission. House File 2676, p. 37 (b) One ex officio, nonvoting member from the recognized membership organization composed of state and provincial psychology regulatory authorities. (3) The ex officio member must have served as staff or member on a state psychology regulatory authority and shall be selected by its respective organization. (4) The commission may remove any member of the executive board as provided in the bylaws. (5) The executive board shall meet at least annually. (6) The executive board shall have all of the following duties and responsibilities: (a) Recommend to the entire commission changes to the rules or bylaws, changes to this compact legislation, fees paid by compact states such as annual dues, and any other applicable fees. (b) Ensure compact administration services are appropriately provided, contractual or otherwise. (c) Prepare and recommend the budget. (d) Maintain financial records on behalf of the commission. (e) Monitor compact compliance of member states and provide compliance reports to the commission. (f) Establish additional committees as necessary. (g) Other duties as provided in the rules or bylaws. f. Financing of the commission. (1) The commission shall pay, or provide for the payment of, the reasonable expenses of its establishment, organization, and ongoing activities. (2) The commission may accept any and all appropriate revenue sources, donations and grants of money, equipment, supplies, materials, and services. (3) The commission may levy on and collect an annual assessment from each compact state or impose fees on other parties to cover the cost of the operations and activities of the commission and its staff which must be in a total amount sufficient to cover its annual budget as approved each year for which revenue is not provided by other sources. The aggregate annual assessment amount shall be allocated based upon a formula to be determined by the commission which shall promulgate a rule binding upon all compact states. House File 2676, p. 38 (4) The commission shall not incur obligations of any kind prior to securing the funds adequate to meet the same; nor shall the commission pledge the credit of any of the compact states, except by and with the authority of the compact state. (5) The commission shall keep accurate accounts of all receipts and disbursements. The receipts and disbursements of the commission shall be subject to the audit and accounting procedures established under its bylaws. However, all receipts and disbursements of funds handled by the commission shall be audited yearly by a certified or licensed public accountant and the report of the audit shall be included in and become part of the annual report of the commission. g. Qualified immunity, defense, and indemnification. (1) The members, officers, executive director, employees, and representatives of the commission shall be immune from suit and liability, either personally or in their official capacity, for any claim for damage to or loss of property or personal injury or other civil liability caused by or arising out of any actual or alleged act, error, or omission that occurred, or that the person against whom the claim is made had a reasonable basis for believing occurred within the scope of commission employment, duties, or responsibilities; provided that nothing in this subparagraph shall be construed to protect any such person from suit or liability for any damage, loss, injury, or liability caused by the intentional or willful or wanton misconduct of that person. (2) The commission shall defend any member, officer, executive director, employee, or representative of the commission in any civil action seeking to impose liability arising out of any actual or alleged act, error, or omission that occurred within the scope of commission employment, duties, or responsibilities, or that the person against whom the claim is made had a reasonable basis for believing occurred within the scope of commission employment, duties, or responsibilities; provided that nothing in this subparagraph shall be construed to prohibit that person from retaining the personâs own counsel; and provided further, that the actual or alleged act, error, or omission did not result from that personâs intentional or willful or wanton misconduct. House File 2676, p. 39 (3) The commission shall indemnify and hold harmless any member, officer, executive director, employee, or representative of the commission for the amount of any settlement or judgment obtained against that person arising out of any actual or alleged act, error, or omission that occurred within the scope of commission employment, duties, or responsibilities, or that such person had a reasonable basis for believing occurred within the scope of commission employment, duties, or responsibilities, provided that the actual or alleged act, error, or omission did not result from the intentional or willful or wanton misconduct of that person. 11. Article XI ââ Rulemaking. a. The commission shall exercise its rulemaking powers pursuant to the criteria set forth in this article XI and the rules adopted under this article XI. Rules and amendments shall become binding as of the date specified in each rule or amendment. b. If a majority of the legislatures of the compact states rejects a rule, by enactment of a statute or resolution in the same manner used to adopt this compact, then such rule shall have no further force and effect in any compact state. c. Rules or amendments to the rules shall be adopted at a regular or special meeting of the commission. d. Prior to promulgation and adoption of a final rule or rules by the commission, and at least sixty days in advance of the meeting at which the rule will be considered and voted upon, the commission shall file a notice of proposed rulemaking on both of the following: (1) On the internet site of the commission. (2) On the internet site of each compact stateâs psychology regulatory authority or the publication in which each state would otherwise publish proposed rules. e. The notice of proposed rulemaking shall include all of the following: (1) The proposed time, date, and location of the meeting in which the rule will be considered and voted upon. (2) The text of the proposed rule or amendment and the reason for the proposed rule. (3) A request for comments on the proposed rule from any House File 2676, p. 40 interested person. (4) The manner in which interested persons may submit notice to the commission of their intention to attend the public hearing and any written comments. f. Prior to adoption of a proposed rule, the commission shall allow persons to submit written data, facts, opinions, and arguments, which shall be made available to the public. g. The commission shall grant an opportunity for a public hearing before it adopts a rule or amendment if a hearing is requested by any of the following: (1) At least twenty-five persons who submit comments independently of each other. (2) A governmental subdivision or agency. (3) A duly appointed person in an association that has at least twenty-five members. h. If a hearing is held on the proposed rule or amendment, the commission shall publish the place, time, and date of the scheduled public hearing. (1) All persons wishing to be heard at the hearing shall notify the executive director of the commission or other designated member in writing of their desire to appear and testify at the hearing not less than five business days before the scheduled date of the hearing. (2) Hearings shall be conducted in a manner providing each person who wishes to comment a fair and reasonable opportunity to comment orally or in writing. (3) No transcript of the hearing is required, unless a written request for a transcript is made, in which case the person requesting the transcript shall bear the cost of producing the transcript. A recording may be made in lieu of a transcript under the same terms and conditions as a transcript. This subparagraph shall not preclude the commission from making a transcript or recording of the hearing if it so chooses. (4) Nothing in this article shall be construed as requiring a separate hearing on each rule. Rules may be grouped for the convenience of the commission at hearings required by this article. i. Following the scheduled hearing date, or by the close of business on the scheduled hearing date if the hearing was House File 2676, p. 41 not held, the commission shall consider all written and oral comments received. j. The commission shall, by majority vote of all members, take final action on the proposed rule and shall determine the effective date of the rule, if any, based on the rulemaking record and the full text of the rule. k. If no written notice of intent to attend the public hearing by interested parties is received, the commission may proceed with promulgation of the proposed rule without a public hearing. l. Upon determination that an emergency exists, the commission may consider and adopt an emergency rule without prior notice, opportunity for comment, or hearing, provided that the usual rulemaking procedures provided in this compact and in this article shall be retroactively applied to the rule as soon as reasonably possible, in no event later than ninety days after the effective date of the rule. For the purposes of this paragraph, an emergency rule is one that must be adopted immediately in order to address any of the following: (1) Meet an imminent threat to public health, safety, or welfare. (2) Prevent a loss of commission or compact state funds. (3) Meet a deadline for the promulgation of an administrative rule that is established by federal law or rule. (4) Protect public health and safety. m. The commission or an authorized committee of the commission may direct revisions to a previously adopted rule or amendment for purposes of correcting typographical errors, errors in format, errors in consistency, or grammatical errors. Public notice of any revisions shall be posted on the website of the commission. The revision shall be subject to challenge by any person for a period of thirty days after posting. The revision may be challenged only on grounds that the revision results in a material change to a rule. A challenge shall be made in writing, and delivered to the chair of the commission prior to the end of the notice period. If no challenge is made, the revision will take effect without further action. If the revision is challenged, the revision shall not take effect without the approval of the commission. House File 2676, p. 42 12. Article XII ââ Oversight, dispute resolution, and enforcement. a. Oversight. (1) The executive, legislative, and judicial branches of state government in each compact state shall enforce this compact and take all actions necessary and appropriate to effectuate this compactâs purposes and intent. The provisions of this compact and the rules promulgated under this compact shall have standing as statutory law. (2) All courts shall take judicial notice of this compact and the rules in any judicial or administrative proceeding in a compact state pertaining to the subject matter of this compact which may affect the powers, responsibilities, or actions of the commission. (3) The commission shall be entitled to receive service of process in any such proceeding, and shall have standing to intervene in such a proceeding for all purposes. Failure to provide service of process to the commission shall render a judgment or order void as to the commission, this compact, or promulgated rules. b. Default, technical assistance, and termination. (1) If the commission determines that a compact state has defaulted in the performance of its obligations or responsibilities under this compact or the promulgated rules, the commission shall do all of the following: (a) Provide written notice to the defaulting state and other compact states of the nature of the default, the proposed means of remedying the default, or any other action to be taken by the commission. (b) Provide remedial training and specific technical assistance regarding the default. (2) If a state in default fails to remedy the default, the defaulting state may be terminated from this compact upon an affirmative vote of a majority of the compact states, and all rights, privileges, and benefits conferred by this compact shall be terminated on the effective date of termination. A remedy of the default does not relieve the offending state of obligations or liabilities incurred during the period of default. House File 2676, p. 43 (3) Termination of membership in this compact shall be imposed only after all other means of securing compliance have been exhausted. Notice of intent to suspend or terminate shall be submitted by the commission to the governor, the majority and minority leaders of the defaulting stateâs legislature, and each of the compact states. (4) A compact state which has been terminated is responsible for all assessments, obligations, and liabilities incurred through the effective date of termination, including obligations which extend beyond the effective date of termination. (5) The commission shall not bear any costs incurred by the state which is found to be in default or which has been terminated from this compact, unless agreed upon in writing between the commission and the defaulting state. (6) The defaulting state may appeal the action of the commission by petitioning the United States district court for the state of Georgia or the federal district where the compact has its principal offices. The prevailing member shall be awarded all costs of such litigation, including reasonable attorney fees. c. Dispute resolution. (1) Upon request by a compact state, the commission shall attempt to resolve disputes related to this compact which arise among compact states and between compact and noncompact states. (2) The commission shall promulgate a rule providing for both mediation and binding dispute resolution for disputes that arise before the commission. d. Enforcement. (1) The commission, in the reasonable exercise of its discretion, shall enforce the provisions and rules of this compact. (2) By majority vote, the commission may initiate legal action in the United States district court for the state of Georgia or the federal district where the compact has its principal offices against a compact state in default to enforce compliance with the provisions of the compact and its promulgated rules and bylaws. The relief sought may include both injunctive relief and damages. In the event judicial House File 2676, p. 44 enforcement is necessary, the prevailing member shall be awarded all costs of such litigation, including reasonable attorneyâs fees. (3) The remedies in this article shall not be the exclusive remedies of the commission. The commission may pursue any other remedies available under federal or state law. 13. Article XIII ââ Date of implementation of the psychology interjurisdictional compact commission and associated rules, withdrawal, and amendments. a. This compact shall come into effect on the date on which the compact is enacted into law in the seventh compact state. The provisions which become effective at that time shall be limited to the powers granted to the commission relating to assembly and the promulgation of rules. Thereafter, the commission shall meet and exercise rulemaking powers necessary to the implementation and administration of this compact. b. Any state which joins the compact subsequent to the commissionâs initial adoption of the rules shall be subject to the rules as they exist on the date on which the compact becomes law in that state. Any rule which has been previously adopted by the commission shall have the full force and effect of law on the day the compact becomes law in that state. c. Any compact state may withdraw from this compact by enacting a statute repealing the compact. (1) A compact stateâs withdrawal shall not take effect until six months after enactment of the repealing statute. (2) Withdrawal shall not affect the continuing requirement of the withdrawing stateâs psychology regulatory authority to comply with the investigative and adverse action reporting requirements of this compact prior to the effective date of withdrawal. d. Nothing contained in this compact shall be construed to invalidate or prevent any psychology licensure agreement or other cooperative arrangement between a compact state and a noncompact state which does not conflict with the provisions of this compact. House File 2676, p. 45 e. This compact may be amended by the compact states. No amendment to this compact shall become effective and binding upon any compact state until it is enacted into the law of all compact states. 14. Article XIV ââ Construction and severability. This compact shall be liberally construed so as to effectuate the purposes thereof. If this compact shall be held contrary to the constitution of any compact state, the compact shall remain in full force and effect as to the remaining compact states. ______________________________ PAT GRASSLEY Speaker of the House ______________________________ AMY SINCLAIR President of the Senate I hereby certify that this bill originated in the House and is known as House File 2676, Ninety-first General Assembly. ______________________________ MEGHAN NELSON Chief Clerk of the House Approved _______________, 2026 ______________________________ KIM REYNOLDS Governor